Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Extradition

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31A Am. Jur. 2d Extradition § 1 et seq.

Immunity of extradited person from service of process, 20 ALR2d 163.

Extradition under state statutes providing for reciprocal enforcement of duty to support dependents, 42 ALR2d 768.

Test of “dual criminality” where extradition to or from foreign nation is sought, 132 ALR Fed 525.

35 C.J.S. Extradition and Detainers § 1 et seq.

§ 7-3-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Executive authority” includes the governor, and any person performing the functions of governor in a state other than this state;

“Governor” includes any person performing the functions of governor by authority of the law of this state;

“State”, referring to a state other than this state, includes any other organized or unorganized state or territory of the United States of America;

“This act” means W.S.

7-3-201

through

7-3-227

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-2401; W.S. 1957, § 7-27; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to the authority of the director of corrections to apply to the governor to seek extradition of an inmate apprehended in another state, see §

25-1-104

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Deschenes v. Beall, 61 Wyo. 39, 154 P.2d 524,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1945); Long v. Shillinger, 927 F.2d 525,

1991 U.S. App. LEXIS 3473

(10th Cir. 1991); Turner v. State, 2015 WY 29,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Feb. 25, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Wyoming Extradition,” see XI Wyo. L.J. 51.

§ 7-3-202.
Duty of governor to have fugitives arrested and delivered up to proper authorities.

Subject to the qualifications of this act, and the applicable provisions of the United States constitution and acts of congress, the governor of this state shall have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 10-2402; W.S. 1957, § 7-28; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-201(a)(iv).

§ 7-3-203.
General requirements as to demand by another state.

No demand for the extradition of a person charged with crime in another state shall be recognized by the governor unless in writing and accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by an information supported by affidavit in the state having jurisdiction of the crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a magistrate there, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereon. The indictment, information, or affidavit made before the magistrate shall substantially charge the person demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that state and the copy shall be authenticated by the executive authority making the demand, which shall be prima facie evidence of its truth.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 10-2403; W.S. 1957, § 7-29; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity that demanding state show probable cause to arrest fugitive in extradition proceedings, 90 ALR3d 1085.

§ 7-3-204.
Investigation of demand.

When a demand shall be made upon the governor of this state by the executive authority of another state for a surrender of a person charged with crime, the governor may call upon the attorney general or any district attorney in this state to investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to him the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he should be surrendered.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 10-2404; W.S. 1957, § 7-30; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Wyoming Extradition,” see XI Wyo. L.J. 51.

§ 7-3-205.
Contents of demand.

A warrant of extradition shall not be issued unless the documents presented by the executive authority making the demand show that the accused:

Except in cases arising under W.S.

7-3-206

, was present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and thereafter fled from the state;

Is now in this state; and

Is lawfully charged by indictment found or by information filed by a prosecuting officer and supported by affidavit to the facts, or by affidavit made before a magistrate in that state, with having committed a crime under the laws of that state, or that he has been convicted of a crime in that state and has escaped from confinement or broken his parole.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 10-2405; W.S. 1957, § 7-31; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity that demanding state show probable cause to arrest fugitive in extradition proceedings, 90 ALR3d 1085.

§ 7-3-206.
Surrender of accused when not present in demanding state at time of crime.

The governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in that other state in the manner provided in W.S.

7-3-205

, with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in that state whose executive authority is making the demand. The provisions of this act not otherwise inconsistent shall apply to this situation notwithstanding the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime and has not fled therefrom.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 10-2406; W.S. 1957, § 7-32; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 7-3-201(a)(iv).

§ 7-3-207.
Issuance of governor's warrant for arrest; contents.

If the governor decides that the demand should be complied with, he shall sign a warrant of arrest, sealed with the state seal, and directed to a sheriff, marshal, coroner or other person entrusted to execute it. The warrant shall substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 10-2407; W.S. 1957, § 7-33; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-208.
Effect of warrant.

The warrant shall:

Authorize the officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any place where he may be found within the state and to deliver him to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state; and

Command the aid of all sheriffs and other peace officers in the execution of the warrant.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 10-2408; W.S. 1957, § 7-34; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-3-209.
Authority of person making arrest to command assistance.

Every officer or other person authorized by the governor to make the arrest has the same authority in arresting the accused to command assistance as sheriffs and other officers have in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with the like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 10-2409; W.S. 1957, § 7-35; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-210.
Right of accused to counsel; opportunity to apply for writ of habeas corpus; notice of writ and hearing.

No person arrested pursuant to W.S.

7-3-208

shall be delivered over to the agent whom the executive authority demanding him shall have appointed to receive him unless he has been informed of the demand made for his surrender and of the crime with which he is charged, and that he has the right to demand legal counsel. If the prisoner, his friends, or counsel shall state that he or they desire to test the legality of the arrest, the prisoner shall be taken forthwith before a judge of a court of record in this state, who shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When the writ is applied for, notice thereof, and of the time and place of hearing thereon, shall be given to the prosecuting officer of the county in which the arrest is made and in which the accused is in custody, and to the appointed agent of the demanding state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 10-2410; W.S. 1957, § 7-36; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to right to counsel generally, see §

7-6-104

.

As to constitutional right of accused to counsel, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to habeas corpus, see chapter 27 of title 1.

Power to extradite arises under federal constitution and statutes.

Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

But procedure for extradition is governed by state law.

Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Rights accorded by section for fugitive's benefit. —

The requirement that a person arrested as a fugitive be advised of his right to counsel and be taken before a court patently benefits the prisoner, not the state. Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

No appeal if petition dismissed. —

Where petitioner has right to go before other judges and other courts to secure release, a judgment dismissing habeas corpus petition and remanding petitioner to custody under an extradition warrant is not appealable. Ex parte Brugneaux, 51 Wyo. 103, 63 P.2d 800,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1937).

Nor if one detained discharged. —

The rule denying the right of appeal in a case in which one detained is discharged on a writ of habeas corpus applies in extradition proceedings. Geyer v. Tuck, 68 Wyo. 52, 229 P.2d 924,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1951).

§ 7-3-211.
Penalty for surrendering accused without hearing.

Any officer who delivers to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his custody under the governor’s warrant in violation of W.S.

7-3-210

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 10-2411; W.S. 1957, § 7-37; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Stated

in

Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. 1974).

§ 7-3-212.
Confinement in jail for safekeeping; expenses.

The officer or person executing the governor’s warrant of arrest, or the agent of the demanding state to whom the prisoner may have been delivered, may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city en route to his destination. The keeper of the jail shall receive and safely keep the prisoner until the person having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route. The person having charge of the prisoner is chargeable with the expense of keeping him in jail.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 10-2412; W.S. 1957, § 7-38; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of extraditee to bail after issuance of governor's warrant and pending final disposition of habeas corpus claim, 13 ALR5th 118.

§ 7-3-213.
Issuance of warrant for arrest by judge or magistrate.

The judge or magistrate shall issue a warrant for arrest when:

Any person within this state is charged on the oath of any credible person before the judge or other magistrate of this state with the commission of a crime in any other state, and except in cases arising under W.S.

7-3-206

, with having fled from justice; or

A complaint has been made before any judge or other magistrate in this state setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another state that a crime has been committed in that other state and that the accused has been charged in that state with the commission of the crime, and, except in cases arising under W.S.

7-3-206

, has fled therefrom and is believed to have been found in this state.

The warrant to the sheriff of the county in which the oath or complaint is filed shall direct him to apprehend the person charged, wherever he may be found in this state, and bring him before the judge or magistrate or any other judge, court, or magistrate who may be convenient to the place where the arrest may be made, to answer the charge or complaint and affidavit. A certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 10-2413; W.S. 1957, § 7-39; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to warrant upon complaint generally, see Rule 4, W.R. Cr. P.

§ 7-3-214.
Authority to arrest person without warrant.

The arrest of a person may be lawfully made by an officer or a private citizen without a warrant upon reasonable information that the accused is charged in the courts of another state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year. When arrested under this section the accused shall be taken before a judge or magistrate as soon as possible and complaint shall be made against him under oath setting forth the ground for the arrest as in W.S.

7-3-213

. Thereafter his answer shall be heard as if he had been arrested on a warrant.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 10-2414; W.S. 1957, § 7-40; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to arrest without warrant generally, see §

7-2-102

.

As to when private person may make arrest generally, see §

7-8-101

.

Power to extradite arises under federal constitution and statutes.

Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

But procedure for extradition governed by state law.

Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Rights accorded person arrested as fugitive for his benefit.—

The requirement that a person arrested as a fugitive be advised of his right to counsel and be taken before a court patently benefits the prisoner, not the state. Sanders v. Conine, 506 F.2d 530, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5851 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

§ 7-3-215.
Examination of person arrested without warrant; commitment pending demand.

If from the examination before the judge or magistrate it appears that the person held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and that he probably committed the crime, and, except in cases arising under W.S.

7-3-206

, that he has fled from justice, the judge or magistrate shall commit him to jail by a warrant reciting the accusation and specifying the time as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in W.S.

7-3-216

, or until he shall be legally discharged.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 10-2415; W.S. 1957, § 7-41; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to preliminary examination, see Rule 5.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of extraditee to bail after issuance of governor's warrant and pending final disposition of habeas corpus claim, 13 ALR5th 118.

§ 7-3-216.
Right of person arrested without warrant to bail.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, the judge or magistrate shall admit the arrested person to bail by bond or undertaking, with sufficient sureties, and in such sum as he deems proper. The bail or bond shall be conditioned for the appearance of the arrested person before the judge or magistrate at a time specified in the bond or undertaking, and for his surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the governor of this state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 10-2416; W.S. 1957, § 7-42; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to bail generally, see chapter 10 of this title and Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of extraditee to bail after issuance of governor's warrant and pending final disposition of habeas corpus claim, 13 ALR5th 118.

§ 7-3-217.
Failure of state to demand person arrested without warrant within time specified.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant, bond, or undertaking, the judge or magistrate may discharge him or may recommit him to a further day, or may again take bail for his appearance and surrender, as provided in W.S.

7-3-216

. At the expiration of the second period of commitment, or if he has been bailed and appeared according to the terms of his bond or undertaking, the judge or magistrate may either discharge him, or may require him to enter into a new bond or undertaking, to appear and surrender himself at another day.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 10-2417; W.S. 1957, § 7-43; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of extraditee to bail after issuance of governor's warrant and pending final disposition of habeas corpus claim, 13 ALR5th 118.

§ 7-3-218.
Failure of prisoner admitted to bail to appear.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender himself according to the condition of his bond, the court shall order the bond forfeited. Recovery may be had on the bond in the name of the state as in the case of other bonds or undertakings given by the accused in criminal proceedings within this state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 18; C.S. 1945, § 10-2418; W.S. 1957, § 7-44; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of forfeited bail generally, see §

7-10-105

and Rule 3.1(d), W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of extraditee to bail after issuance of governor's warrant and pending final disposition of habeas corpus claim, 13 ALR5th 118.

§ 7-3-219.
Procedure where criminal prosecution pending against accused in state.

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against the person under the laws of this state and is still pending, the governor at his discretion either may surrender him on the demand of the executive authority of another state, or may hold him until he has been tried and discharged, or convicted and punished in this state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 19; C.S. 1945, § 10-2419; W.S. 1957, § 7-45; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-220.
Inquiry into guilt or innocence of accused.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of which he is charged may not be inquired into by the governor or in any proceeding after the demand for extradition as provided by W.S.

7-3-203

shall have been presented to the governor, except as it may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 20; C.S. 1945, § 10-2420; W.S. 1957, § 7-46; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-221.
Recall of, or issuance of new, warrant.

The governor may recall his warrant of arrest, or may issue another warrant whenever he deems proper.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 21; C.S. 1945, § 10-2421; W.S. 1957, § 7-47; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-222.
Demand that accused be returned to this state; issuance of warrant.

Upon receipt of an application as provided by W.S.

7-3-223

, the governor of this state may demand a person charged with crime in this state, or with violation of parole, from the chief executive of any other state, or from the chief justice or an associate justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand under the laws of the United States.

The governor shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state, to some agent, commending him to receive the person so charged if delivered to him and convey him to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 22; C.S. 1945, § 10-2422; W.S. 1957, § 7-48; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-223.
Application for return of accused to this state.

When the return to this state of a person charged with crime in this state is required, the district attorney for the county in which the offense is committed shall present to the governor a written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged. The application shall state:

The name of the person charged;

The crime charged against him;

The approximate time, place and circumstances of the commission of the crime; and

The state and address or location where the accused is believed to be at the time the application is made.

As part of the application under subsection (a) of this section the district attorney shall certify that in his opinion justice requires the arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial, and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

The application under subsection (a) of this section shall be verified by affidavit and shall be executed in duplicate. It shall be accompanied by two (2) certified copies of the indictment returned, or information filed, or of the complaint and affidavit made to the magistrate, stating the offense with which the accused is charged. The district attorney may also attach further affidavits and other documents in duplicate as he deems proper to be submitted with the application. One (1) copy of the application with the action of the governor indicated by his endorsement, and one (1) of the certified copies of the indictment, information or complaint and affidavit, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state to remain of record in that office. The other copy of all papers shall be forwarded with the governor’s requisition.

When the return to this state of a person charged with violating the conditions of his parole is required, the chairman of the board of parole shall present to the governor a written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged with parole violation. The application shall state:

The name of the parolee;

The parole violation charged against him;

The approximate time, place and circumstances of the commission of the violation; and

The state and address where the parolee is believed to be at the time the application is made.

As part of the application under subsection (d) of this section the chairman of the board of parole shall certify that in his opinion justice requires the arrest and return of the parolee to this state for hearing before the board of parole and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

The application under subsection (d) of this section shall be verified by affidavit, shall be executed in duplicate and shall be accompanied by two (2) certified copies of the judgment and sentence, parole grant, parole agreement, recommendation for revocation of parole and order of arrest issued by the board of parole. The chairman of the board of parole may also attach further affidavits and other documents in duplicate as he deems proper to be submitted with the application. One (1) copy of the application with the action of the governor indicated by his endorsement, and one (1) of the certified copies required by this subsection, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state to remain of record in that office. The other copy of all papers shall be forwarded with the governor’s requisition.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 23; C.S. 1945, § 10-2423; W.S. 1957, § 7-49; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 30, § 2; ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state board of parole, see §

7-13-401

.

§ 7-3-224.
Payment of expenses for return of accused to this state.

The state shall pay the expenses involved in the return to this state of a person charged with violating the terms of his parole or who has escaped from a state penal institution or who has escaped from a corrections program provided for inmates of a state penal institution other than a defendant serving a split sentence of incarceration under W.S.

7-13-107

or a probationer participating in a residential or nonresidential community correctional program pursuant to W.S.

7-18-108

. In all other cases the expenses of extradition shall be paid by the county applying for the return of the person.

Expenses authorized under this section include the fees paid to the officers of the state on whose governor the requisition is made, and mileage for all necessary travel in returning the person not exceeding the rate set in W.S.

9-3-103

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 24; C.S. 1945, § 10-2424; W.S. 1957, § 7-50; Laws 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1987, ch 157, § 3; 1989, ch. 32, § 1; 1999, ch. 174, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming state penitentiary, see §

25-1-201

.

§ 7-3-225.
Service of civil process on person brought into state.

A person brought into this state on extradition based on a criminal charge is not subject to service of personal process in any civil action arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceedings to answer which he is returned, until he has been convicted in the criminal proceedings, or if acquitted, until he has had ample opportunity to return to the state from which he was extradited.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 25; C.S. 1945, § 10-2425; W.S. 1957, § 7-51; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-3-226.
Charging of person brought into state with other crimes.

After a person has been brought back to this state upon extradition proceedings, he may be tried in this state for other crimes which he may be charged with having committed here, as well as that specified in the requisition for his extradition.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 10-2426; W.S. 1957, § 7-52; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of doctrine of specialty to federal criminal prosecution of accused extradited from foreign country, 112 ALR Fed 473.

§ 7-3-227.
Construction of provisions.

This act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 27; C.S. 1945, § 10-2427; W.S. 1957, § 7-53; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-201(a)(iv).

Severability. —

Laws 1935, ch. 122, § 28, provides: “If any part of this act is for any reason declared void, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act.”

Regaining custody. —

Although Wyoming's version of the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act omitted part of § 25 and §§ 25-A and 25-B of the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act, which specifically address the problem of regaining custody, Wyoming's scheme of extradition permits the state to regain custody absent a specific waiver of jurisdiction. Engberg v. State, 874 P.2d 890,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited in

Turner v. State, 2015 WY 29,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Feb. 25, 2015).